Hawaii statutes.
[§634F-1] Definitions. As used in this
chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Governmental body" includes a
branch, department, agency, instrumentality, official, employee, agent, or
other person acting under color of law of the United States, a state, or
subdivision of a state or other public authority.

"Judicial claim" or "claim"
includes any lawsuit, cause of action, claim, cross-claim, counterclaim, or
other judicial pleading or filing requesting relief.

"Lacks substantial justification"
means substantially frivolous, substantially groundless, or substantially
vexatious.

"Motion" includes any motion to
dismiss, for summary judgment, for judgment on the pleadings or to strike, a
demurrer, or any other judicial pleading filed to dispose of a judicial claim.

"Moving party" means any person on
whose behalf the motion described in section 634F-2 is filed seeking dismissal
of the judicial claim.

"Person" includes any individual,
corporation, association, organization, partnership, two or more persons having
a joint or common interest, or other legal entity.

"Public participation" means any oral
or written testimony submitted or provided to a governmental body during the
course of a governmental proceeding.

"Responding party" means any person
against whom the motion described in section 634F-2 is filed.

"SLAPP" means a strategic lawsuit
against public participation and refers to a lawsuit that lacks substantial
justification or is interposed for delay or harassment and that is solely based
on the party's public participation before a governmental body. [L 2002, c 187,
pt of §2]

Case Notes

Given the allegations in plaintiff's complaint, the filing of
the office of disciplinary counsel (ODC) complaint by defendant against
plaintiff did not constitute "public participation" before a
governmental body, as defined in this section, because the ODC complaint did
not involve "oral or written testimony" but rather set forth
allegations and was a request to the ODC for an investigation. Based on the
plain meaning of "testimony", even when liberally construed, the ODC
complaint and allegations contained therein were not "testimony" and
were not protected under chapter 634F. 129 H. 95 (App.), 294 P.3d 1081 (2013).

With respect to plaintiff's claims based on defendant
siblings' communications with the mayor, the mayor's assistant, and members of
the county council, the communications did not constitute "testimony"
submitted or provided "during the course of a governmental proceeding"
and did not constitute a strategic lawsuit against public participation. Even
under a liberal construction of this section, nothing in chapter 634F suggests
that an individual's unsolicited and informal communication with a government
official, when there is no formal process or procedure in progress, constitutes
"testimony submitted or provided to a governmental body during the course
of a governmental proceeding". 129 H. 95 (App.), 294 P.3d 1081 (2013).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next